Utah statutes.
16-10a-908.   Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain liability insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation, or who, while serving as a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, fiduciary, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation or other person, or of an employee benefit plan, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under Section 16-10a-902, 16-10a-903, or 16-10a-907. Insurance may be procured from any insurance company designated by the board of directors, whether the insurance company is formed under the laws of this state or any other jurisdiction of the United States or elsewhere, including any insurance company in which the corporation has an equity or any other interest through stock ownership or otherwise.

